Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB792.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1554(f)(1) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 1554. Holocaust, Genocide and Human Rights Violations Instruction.--* * *(f) [The] Following the 2025-2026 school year and every five (5) years thereafter, the State Board of Education shall:(1) Conduct a study regarding the manner in which instruction in the Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations is offered by school entities in this Commonwealth. In conducting the study, the State Board of Education shall 1234567891011121314151617181920 request that each school entity provide the State Board of Education with information concerning whether the school entity offers such instruction and the manner in which such instruction is offered. Each school entity shall provide information to the State Board of Education in response to a request under this paragraph. [Following the 2016-2017 school year, but not later than November 30, 2017,] No later than November 30, 2027, and every five (5) years thereafter, the State Board of Education shall issue a report to the Governor, the Secretary of Education, the Chairman and Minority Chairman of the Education Committee of the Senate and the Chairman and Minority Chairman of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives addressing the following:(i) The number of school entities offering instruction in the Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations.(ii) The number of school entities using the curriculum guidelines established by the Department of Education under subsection (b).(iii) The number of school entities using the in-service training programs made available by the Department of Education under subsection (c).(iv) A description of the manner in which school entities are offering instruction in the Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations, including the number of hours of instruction offered, the grade levels at which such instruction is offered and the course within such instruction is integrated.(v) The recommendations for improvements to the offering of instruction in the Holocaust, genocide and human rights violations, including updated curriculum guidelines and recommended legislation.20250HB0792PN0816 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0792PN0816 - 3 - 12